Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2237
Rules and regulations.

The Coordinating
Commission for Postsecondary Education may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the Community College Aid Act.

Laws 2012, LB946, § 7.